"Now lift the patient's feet over the roll of fresh and soiled linen to the freshly made part, then have her roll her body over that side."
"Now, I said, if you will take the trouble to move that wood pile you will find in it the remains of the rabbit half devoured and the mink himself."
"Nowadays a man is bound at his peril to keep his cattle from trespassing, and he is liable for damage done by his dog or by any fierce animal, if he has notice of a tendency in the brute to do the harm complained of."
Of course one must have cultivated a great degree of sensitiveness to mental impressions before he will be able to receive and respond to the direction impressions in this case.
"Of course some of the public may prefer to accept this erroneous theory, but we wish to say here positively that if any person will honestly investigate for himself, and will learn to make the demonstrations personally, he or she will soon discover that muscle reading has nothing to do with the genuine phenomena."
"Of course, the average public performer soon discovers that the average patron of his performance attends principally to be amused, and entertained, rather than to be instructed."
"On one occasion, in order to be doubly guarded against collusion, they closed Mr Smith's ears with putty, tied a bandage around his eyes and ears, pulled a bolster-case over his head, and then covered him all over with a blanket which completely enveloped his body and head."
"On the other hand, a century [348] later, it distinctly appears from Bracton, that the heir was only bound so far as property had descended to him, and in the early sources of the Continent, Norman as well as other, the same limitation appears."
"On the other hand, if a man who was a good rider bought a horse with no appearance of vice and mounted it to ride home, there would be no such apparent danger as to make him answerable if the horse became unruly and did damage."
"On the principle of Kant, it is not enough that he has the custody of a thing."
"Once a subject always a subject, said Great Britain, but our answer in 1812 was as it is now: any foreigner after five years' residence within our territory, who has complied with our naturalization laws and taken the oath of allegiance to our flag, becomes one of our citizens as completely as if he were native born."
"Once in office, nevertheless, Jefferson himself appealed to the discredited principle against partisan critics."
"One can easily make nut butter of any kind (except almonds or Brazil nuts) for himself by using the nut grinder that comes with a kitchen food chopper, and can add ground dates, ground popcorn, or whatever he likes; but such preparations will soon grow rancid if not sealed airtight."
One of Charlemagne's additions to the Lex Salica speaks of a freeman who has committed himself to the power of another by way of surety.
One of the first acts of Jefferson was his instruction to Secretary of State Madison to withhold commissions to office which remained undelivered.
"One of these does not look quite natural, and the scout complains of a great deal of pain at the middle of the thigh and thinks he felt something break when he fell."
One to whom an offer is made has a right to assume that it remains open according to its terms until he has actual [307] notice to the contrary.
One who buys land of another gets the very same estate which his seller had.
One who is subjected to forced listening is not free in the enjoyment of all his faculties.
'One wraps himself in a woolen blanket to keep warm--to keep the heat _in_.
"Only a foolish scout would rob himself of his chance to observe the secrets of nest life by stealing the contents, or would take any delight in piling up a collection of egg shells whose value at its best is almost nothing, and whose acquisition is necessarily accompanied by {89} genuine heart pangs on the part of the rightful owners."
"Only the latter, in his opinion, answered the description of income derived from property; whereas a gain accruing to capital, not a _growth_ or an _increment_ of value _in_ the investment did not."
Or was it begun from the apprehension that she might again be removed?
Our pride is like that of a partridge drumming on his log in the wood before the fox leaps upon him.
"Perceiving a hive in the very act of swarming, I contracted the entrance so as to secure the queen when she made her appearance."
"Peters's defense turned on the proposition that inasmuch as Wheaton had not complied with all of the requirements of the act of Congress, his alleged copyright was void."
"PRESIDENTIAL DIPLOMATIC AGENTS What the President may have lost in consequence of the intervention of Congress in this field, he has made good through his early conceded right to employ, in the discharge of his diplomatic function, so-called special, personal, or secret agents without consulting the Senate."
"PRESIDENTIAL IMMUNITY FROM JUDICIAL DIRECTION By the decision of the Court in State of Mississippi _v._ Johnson,[467] in 1867, the President was put beyond the reach of judicial direction in the exercise of any of his powers, whether constitutional or statutory, political or otherwise."
"Provision that if the party [i.e., a person stealing property from the United States] has been convicted, then the judgment against him shall be conclusive evidence in the prosecution against [the] receiver that the property of the United States therein described has been embezzled, stolen, or purloined, _held_ to contravene the Sixth Amendment."
"Provisions relating to codes of fair competition, authorized to be approved by the President in his discretion to effectuate the policy of the act, _held_ invalid as a grant of legislative power (_see_ art."
"Punctual feeding makes good digestion, and even if the baby takes an extra nap it is better to wake a healthy baby to give him his meals at regular hours than to let his digestion get out of order."
Remove the patient to a cool place and have him lie down.
"Said he: The King of England before our Revolution, in the exercise of his prerogative, had always exercised the power to pardon contempts of court, just as he did ordinary crimes and misdemeanors and as he has done to the present day."
"Scout Hunting One scout is given time to go out and hide himself, the remainder then start to find him; he wins if he is not found, or if he can get back to the starting point within a given time without being touched."
"Scouts go out to find, and each in his own way tries to get up to him unseen."
Seat the patient in a chair with his head bent backward.
Secretary Sawyer forthwith issued an order seizing the mills and directing their presidents to operate them as operating managers for the United States in accordance with his regulations and directions.
"She is just as necessary to its welfare, as the soul is to the body, for a colony without a queen must as certainly perish, as a body without the spirit hasten to inevitable decay."
"She reigns therefore, most unquestionably, by a divine right, as every mother is, or ought to be, a queen in her own family."
"Should there be no executor named in the will, or if the person so named refuses to act, or if he dies or resigns, the court will appoint a person to act in his place."
"So long, at least, as only physical or irresponsible agencies, however unforeseen, co-operated with the act complained of to produce the result, the argument which would resolve the case of accidentally striking the plaintiff, when lifting a stick in necessary self-defence, adversely to the defendant, would require a decision against him in every case where his act was a factor in the result complained of."
"So remarks Chief Justice Stone in his summarizing opinion cited above, in Southern Pacific Co. _v._ Arizona."
So the Girl Scout will make up her mind what will fit her house; and of course this means also what will fit the family purse.
So you may show a justification or excuse in the conduct of the plaintiff himself.
"So, by chapter thirty-five, if a slave killed a freeman, he was to be surrendered for one half of the composition to the relatives of the slain man, and the master was to pay the other half."
"Some Bee-Keepers, long before his time, had observed that all the brood in a hive were occasionally drones, and of course, that such colonies rapidly went to ruin."
"Some day you will read the life story of David Glasgow Farragut of whom it is said that, with the exception of Nelson, the great English admiral, he was as great an admiral as ever sailed the broad or narrow seas."
"Sometimes it is necessary to work an hour or two before the flicker of an eyelid or a gasp from the patient rewards the life saver's efforts, and then he must carefully piece in the breathing until natural breathing is resumed."
"Speaking for the Court, Justice Jackson said: No matter whether young Haupt's mission was benign or traitorous, known or unknown to the defendant, these acts were aid and comfort to him."
"SPECIAL DELIVERY The purpose of what is known, in connection with the post office, as the Special Delivery System, is to insure the delivery of any letter or package to the person, to whom it is addressed, as soon as it reaches his post office."
"Substantially contemporaneously a well read French critic described our system as _Le Gouvernment des Juges_ (1921); while toward the end of the period Louis B. Boudin published his well known _Government by Judiciary_ (2 vols., 1932)."
"Such a gentleman, he said, I have in mind."
Such a practice is denounced as being almost as cruel and silly as to kill a hen for the sake of obtaining her feathers or a few of her eggs.
"Such precautions on the part of a young queen, are highly necessary that she may not mistake her own hive on her return, and lose her life by attempting to enter that of another colony."
"Suppose that a defendant were allowed to testify that, before acting, he considered carefully what would be the conduct of a prudent man under the circumstances, and, having formed the best judgment he could, acted accordingly."
"Swimming For physical development the breast stroke is useful, for it is one that is used in carrying a tired swimmer and is used to go to the bottom for lost articles and to search for a person who has sunk before help has reached him."
"'T is one that he is called upon, nay, constrained by all the obligations that form the bands of society, to discharge sincerely and honestly."
"Taking cognizance of the fact that this doctrine had never been extended to the field of income taxation or consistently applied in the field of property taxation, where the concepts of business situs as well as of domiciliary situs had been utilized to sustain double taxation, especially in connection with shares of corporate stock, the Court declared that a correct interpretation of constitutional requirements would dictate the following conclusions: From the beginning of our constitutional system control over the person at the place of his domicile and his duty there, common to all citizens, to contribute to the support of government have been deemed to afford an adequate constitutional basis for imposing on him a tax on the use and enjoyment of rights in intangibles measured by their value."
"TERMINATION OF TREATIES BY NOTICE The initial precedent in the matter of termination by notice occurred in 1846, when by the Joint Resolution of April 27, Congress authorized the President at his discretion to notify the British Government of the abrogation of the Convention of August 6, 1827, relative to the joint occupation of the Oregon Territory."
"That is the simple white spot meaning, _Here is the trail._ The Indian in making it may nick off an infinitesimal speck of bark with his knife, the trapper with his hatchet may make it as big as a dollar, or the settler with his heavy axe may stab off half the tree-side; but the sign is the same in principle and in meaning, on trunk, log, or branch from Atlantic to Pacific and from Hudson Strait to Rio Grande."
"That was trespass for assault and battery, and it appeared that the defendant, while trying to separate two fighting dogs, had raised his stick over his shoulder in the act of striking, and had accidentally hit the plaintiff in the eye, inflicting upon him a [106] severe injury."
"The Act was the direct outcome of suggestions made by Washington in his message of December 5, 1793."
"The aggregate of the ancestor's rights and duties, or, to use the technical phrase, the total persona sustained by him, was easily separated from his natural personality."
"The appointment was defended by the argument that inasmuch as Mr Black was only fifty-one years old at the time and so would be ineligible for the increased emolument for nineteen years, it was not _as to him_ an increased emolument."
"The baby Opossums--from six to a dozen of them--are born when very small and undeveloped and are immediately placed by the mother in an external pouch, where they continue to grow until they are too large to get into their mother's pocket; then they frequently ride upon their mother's back, clinging to her fur with their finger-like toes and wrapping their tails about their mother's tail."
"The bees do not _sting_ a queen to death, but have a curious mode of crowding or knotting around her, so that she is soon smothered; and while thus imprisoned, she will often make the same piping note which has already been described."
"The bees had now dwindled away to less than half their original number, and the new queen had wings so imperfect that she was unable to fly."
"The boy who is the deer for the first hunt takes the dummy under his arm and runs off, getting ten minutes' start, or until he comes back and shouts ready!"
The bright Girl Scout will keep her eyes open to see how foods are taken care of in the house; which foods must be kept in the cellar; which ones must be stored on the shelves of dry closets; which ones come in sealed parcels; which in paper bags; which in boxes; which in barrels.
"The case turned upon a question which was debated for centuries before it was settled, whether debt would lie for a sum of money promised by the defendant to the plaintiff if he would marry the defendant's daughter."
"The case was stronger for the plaintiff than if the defendant had been acting in self-defence; but the court held that, although the defendant was bound by no duty to separate the dogs, yet, if he was doing a lawful act, he was not liable unless he was wanting in the care which men of ordinary prudence would use under the circumstances, and that the burden was on the plaintiff to prove the want of such care."
"The Chairman of the Court of Awards comes forward, the Captain faces her, salutes, and presents the Eaglet to her."
"The Chinese claim its use among them as early as 2634 B. C., and we have definite information that it was used at sea by them as early as 300 A. D. Marco Polo brought the compass to Europe on his return from Cathay."
"The comb containing the royal cells may then be transferred to that hive, and the queen searched for, and returned with the combs on which she is found, to her proper place."
"The Committee, said Madison, has gone through the bill without making any provision respecting the tenure by which the comptroller is to hold his office."
The contestant can at any time end the bout by lowering his head so the strap slips off; but this counts one against him.
The Creator may be seen in all the works of his hands; but in few more directly than in the wise economy of the Honey-Bee.
"The defendant confessed the delivery, and set up he was robbed of the goods by J.S."
"The defendant, not denying the plaintiff's descent, pleaded in substance that he was not tenant of the manor in his own right."
The depositor in such a bank is free to check out his funds as he pleases.
"The difference between alleging that a defendant was on the wrong side of the road, and that he was negligent, is the difference between an allegation of facts requiring to be excused by a counter allegation of further facts to prevent their being a ground of liability, and an allegation which involves a conclusion of law, and denies in advance the existence of an [114] excuse."
"The doctrine of estate in office was countenanced by Chief Justice Marshall in his opinion in Marbury _v._ Madison, 1 Cr."
The draw sheet is so called because its proper use is to be drawn through under the patient without greatly disturbing her and give her a cool fresh place to lie on.
"The extremity of the sting being barbed like an arrow, the bee can seldom withdraw it, if the substance into which she darts it is at all tenacious."
The Fireless Cooker When a Girl Scout gets to thinking about all the work to be done in a kitchen she will ask some very important questions.
"The first thing to be done, if possible, is to turn off the current by means of the switch, but if this cannot be done _at once_, the patient must be rescued by pulling him away from the wire."
The following table is given for frequent reference use by the Girl Scout while earning her badges in Homecraft.
"The former reiterated his position in Bridges _v._ California; the latter italicized Justice Brandeis' dictum in the Whitney Case: If there be time to expose through discussion the falsehood and fallacies, to avert the evil by the processes of education, the remedy to be applied is more speech, not enforced silence."
"THE GIRL SCOUT COOK BY ULA M. DOW, A. M. _In charge of Division of Food, Simmons College_ The Girl Scout who has earned the Cooking Badge may be a great help at home if she has learned to work quickly and neatly and may get much amusement both at home and on camping parties."
"The government must do two things: it must protect the person and his personal rights as a citizen, and it must also protect property and the rights of property ownership from enemies within, as from without."
"The great laying of the queen, according to some writers, is now over, not however as they erroneously imagine, because her fertility has decreased, but merely because there is not _room_ in the hive for all her eggs."
The holder of an order will not get his money unless he is known to the paying postmaster or is identified.
The knight never waited for opportunity to come to him.
"The latter affirmed that his testimony at the trial of the petitioner was obtained by deceit, fraud, collusion, and coercion, and was known to the prosecutor to be false."
The law lays down no rule as to the form.
"The legislators to whom we owe this act argued that, if a merchant embark a portion of his property upon a hazardous venture, it is reasonable that his stake should be confined to what [7] he puts at risk,--a principle similar to that on which corporations have been so largely created in America during the last fifty years."
"The legislature, on the appointment of a President, is once for all to declare what shall be the compensation for his services during the time for which he shall have been elected."
The liability of the master for his torts is one instance.
"The life, then, of Abraham Lincoln should be a steady inspiration to every boy who wishes to call himself a scout."
The lord is said to have a fee in the homage and services; and therefore no entry upon the land which does not disturb them injures him.
The maker in this case is a friend who loans his name.
The man who owned the automobile and was driving it got out and called one of the boys on the street to come over to him.
The mitigation does not come from the fact that the defendant was beside himself with rage.
"The nominees involved having meantime taken the oath of office and entered upon the discharge of their duties, the President responded with a refusal, saying: I cannot admit the power in the Senate to encroach upon the executive functions by removal of a duly appointed executive officer under the guise of reconsideration of his nomination."
"The notion that the buyer came in adversely to the seller would probably have accompanied the fiction of adverse taking, and he would have stood on his own position as founding a new title."
"The observations of the judicious Blackstone,(1) in reference to the latter, are well worthy of recital: To bereave a man of life, (says he) or by violence to confiscate his estate, without accusation or trial, would be so gross and notorious an act of despotism, as must at once convey the alarm of tyranny throughout the whole nation; but confinement of the person, by secretly hurrying him to jail, where his sufferings are unknown or forgotten, is a less public, a less striking, and therefore a more dangerous engine of arbitrary government."
"The only ground for not applying the general rule is, that the defendant was in such a state that he could not be expected to remember or be influenced by the fear of punishment; if he could be, the ground of exception disappears."
The operator kneels astride or beside the prone figure and lets his hands fall into the spaces between the short ribs.
"The order and the statute which authorized it were held unconstitutional in a notable opinion by Justice Bradley, as follows: Breaking into a house and opening boxes and drawers are circumstances of aggravation; but any forcible and compulsory extortion of a man's own testimony or of his private papers to be used as evidence to convict him of crime or to forfeit his goods, is [forbidden] * * * In this regard the Fourth and Fifth Amendments run almost into each other."
"The Orientals call the honey bee, Deburrah, She that speaketh."
"The original limitation of liability to surrender, when the owner was before the court, could not be accounted for if it was his liability, and not that of his property, which was in question."
"The party to whom orders are transferred must go through the same forms at the office, where payment is made, as if he was the original payee."
"The people in question are Engelard de Cigogn, Geoffrey de Martigny and his brothers, Philip Marc and his brothers, with Geoffrey his nephew, and all their followers."
"The people of a state by the same rule elect their chief magistrate and entitle him His Excellency, the Governor; he is the state's chief or leading citizen."
The person of the king of Great Britain is sacred and inviolable; there is no constitutional tribunal to which he is amenable; no punishment to which he can be subjected without involving the crisis of a national revolution.
The person on the left side of the bed should place the right arm as though she were doing the lifting alone.
"The plaintiff declared on a mutual agreement between himself and the defendant that he would sell, and the defendant would buy, certain Donskoy wool, to be shipped by the plaintiff at Odessa, and delivered in England."
"The power of influencing a person, in the sense in which it is here used, must imply a power of conferring a benefit upon him."
"The President felt himself in a dilemma, whether if it was by statute the duty of the District Attorney to prosecute or not, the President could interfere and direct whether to proceed or not."
The President himself had asked only for ratification and approval of his course by the Senate.
"The principle of our own law, that taking a man's body on execution satisfies the debt, although he is not detained an hour, seems to be explained in that way."
"The purpose of the insurer, if he take out the policy in his own name, is to provide in a measure for the care of his family, or other dependents, in the event of his death."
"The queen bee never stings unless she has such an advantage in the combat, that she can curve her body under that of her rival, in such a manner as to inflict a deadly wound, without any risk of being stung herself!"
"THE QUEEN BEE, or as she may more properly be called THE MOTHER BEE, is the common mother of the whole colony."
"The queen herself never stings, even if handled ever so roughly."
"The queen often does not come out, until a large number have left, and she is frequently so heavy, from the large number of eggs in her ovaries, that she falls to the ground, incapable of rising with the colony into the air."
"The question is, why, if one man is not presumed to intend to pay money until he has money's worth, the other is presumed to intend to give money's worth before he has money."
"The question was put to Secretary Lansing himself in 1918 by a member of the Foreign Relations Committee, as follows: Has the so-called Lansing-Ishii Agreement any binding force on this country?"
"The rations for those who wish to climb to high places must necessarily be condensed, for each Scout must carry her own rations for two weeks."
"The receiver of an express money order can have it cashed at the express office in his town, or sign it and place it in his own bank as if it were cash."
"The salaries of judicial officers may from time to time be altered, as occasion shall require, yet so as never to lessen the allowance with which any particular judge comes into office, in respect to him."
The scout is given a letter addressed to the Military Commandant (usually the lady of the house that he gets to) of any given place a mile or two away.
"The scout learns through the many activities of scouting something of the market places and sources of supply for food; he has some idea as to the cost of living in his own home, and should become a good marketer himself, making himself competent to judge of the quality and prices of food."
The scout without the light can often mingle with the pursuers without being recognized and relieve his friend when he is being hard pressed.
"The secretary of state is the representative of our government through whose office the great work of the foreign service is directly carried on, and upon him devolves therefore the great affairs of state relationships with other countries."
"The sick and helpless she has been, as a Scout, especially trained to help, and she is proud of her handiness and knowledge in this way."
"The soldier obeys by instinct, in a great crisis, only because he has had long practice in obeying when it was a question of unimportant matters."
"The swimmer throws both hands above his head which forces both low in the water and then turns the leverage of his arms against the other's thumbs, breaking the hold easily."
The teacher is no longer a stimulant to adventurous thinking; she becomes instead a pipe line for safe and sound information.
"The thirty-sixth chapter of the ancient text provides that, if a man is killed by a domestic animal, the owner of the animal shall pay half the composition (which he would have had to pay to buy off the blood feud had he killed the man himself), and for the other half give up the beast to the complainant."
"The tired swimmer lies on the back and, extending his arms fully in front, rests a hand on either shoulder of the swimmer who rests facing him in the regular breast position allowing the feet of the other to drop between his own."
"The trailer has the key to a new storehouse of Nature's secrets, another of the Sybilline books is opened to his view; his fairy godmother has, indeed, conferred on him a wonderful {202} gift in opening his eyes to the foot-writing of the trail."
"The Transmitter would then concentrate his mind intently for a few minutes, and in a short time Mr Smith would receive the impression of the mental image in the mind of the Transmitter, and would begin to attempt to reproduce it on paper."
"The treaty was an old one, and its construction had been constantly the subject of controversy between the two countries, and therefore, to obviate what I felt would produce unnecessary trouble in our foreign relations, I indicated to the Russian ambassador the situation, and advised him that I deemed it wise to abrogate the treaty, which, as President, I had the right to do by due notice couched in a friendly and courteous tone and accompanied by an invitation to begin negotiations for a new treaty."
"The trustee in this case is the agent for debtor and creditor, and he must act impartially."
"The truth is, that any person in possession, whether intrusted and answerable over or not, a finder of property as well as a bailee, can sue any one except the true owner for interfering with his possession, as will be shown more particularly at the end of the next Lecture."
The wearing of these badges does not signify that a scout is qualified to make his living by the knowledge gained in securing the award_.
The woman's deftness comes from her experience.
"The writ set forth that the defendant undertook to cure the plaintiff's horse of sickness (manucepit equum praedicti W. de infirmirate), and did his work so negligently that the horse died."
"Then take a full breath and apply your knee to the other's stomach quickly, thus forcing him to expel any air in his lungs and preventing him from getting more air by the hand on mouth and nostrils."
Then the thief should hide his spoil in a safe place about the room.
"There is no trouble in understanding what is meant by saying that a slave has no legal standing, but is absorbed in the family which his master represents before the law."
"There is, therefore, no need to go back further than to the early Norman period, after the appointment of executors had become common, and the heir was more nearly what he is now."
Therefore he must not touch the unfortunate victim unless his own body is thoroughly insulated.
"These are the inscriptions that every hunter must learn to read infallibly, and be they strong or faint, straight or crooked, simple or overwritten with many a puzzling, diverse phrase, he must decipher and follow them swiftly, unerringly if there is to be a successful ending to the hunt which provides his daily food."
These statements represented a belated adoption of the views advanced by Chief Justice Stone in dissenting or concurring opinions which he filed in three of the four decisions rendered during 1930-1932.
"They sought him through all the ranks, and every time they met one of these officers they thought they had come face to face with the king."
"This had more or less taken place in Glanvill's time, and then all that a party had to do was to produce the writing and satisfy the court by inspection that the impression on the wax fitted his opponent's seal."
"This I have repeatedly witnessed in my observing hives, and admired the sagacity of the queen in economizing her necessary work after this fashion, instead of laboriously depositing the eggs in cells where they are not wanted."
"This is a method of association whereby a person joins a partnership, putting in a sum agreed on, and which he may stand to lose as an investment."
This medal is awarded to a scout who saves life with considerable risk to himself.
This will enable the recipient to direct his reply.
"Those cases which attribute possession to a transferee of goods in the hands of a middleman, without distinguishing whether the middleman holds in his own name or the buyer's, are generally right in the result, no doubt, but have added to the confusion of thought upon the subject."
"Thus showing that the vendor changed possession by holding in the name of the purchaser, as his agent to possess."
"Thus, by statute a State validly may provide that one sued in a possessory action cannot bring an action to try title until after judgment shall have been rendered in the possessory action, and until he shall have paid the judgment, if the decision shall have so awarded."
"Thus, it has been held that a suit against the Secretary of the Treasury to review his decision on the rate of duty to be exacted on imported sugar would disturb the whole revenue system of the Government and would in effect be a suit against the United States."
"To avoid a possible misconception, it may be observed that, of course, this question does not necessarily and under all circumstances decide that of liability; a plaintiff may have been on the wrong side of the road, as he may have been negligent, and yet the conduct of the defendant may have been unjustifiable, and a ground of liability."
To complete the order the sender should sign his name in a place indicated for the purpose on the back of the paper.
"To do this, place the hands on either side of the drowning person's head, and tow him floating on his back with the face above the surface of the water, while you swim on your back and keep the body away from you."
"To give a more specific example, if a surgeon from benevolence cuts the umbilical cord of a newly-born child, he cannot stop there and watch the patient bleed to death."
"To return to the English, the later laws, from about a hundred years after Alfred down to the collection known as the laws of Henry I, compiled long after the Conquest, [20] increase the lord's liability for his household, and make him surety for his men's good conduct."
Turn and let her sit down slowly.
"Unless the badge is to be presented to the Captain herself, her recommendation is required."
"Until escape has been made impossible by some means, another may step in and kill or catch and carry off the game if he can."
"Until Reagan _v._ Farmers' Loan and Trust Company[29] the Court maintained a distinction between the duty imposed upon an official by the general laws of the State and the duty imposed by a specific unconstitutional statute and held that whereas an injunction would not lie to restrain a State official from enforcing an act alleged to be unconstitutional in pursuance of the general duties of his office, it would lie to restrain him from performing special duties vested in him by an unconstitutional statute."
"We have made the scout an expert in Life-craft as well as Wood-craft, for he is trained in the things of the heart as well as head and hand."
"We read in Beaumanoir (A.D. 1283) that, if a hired thing is stolen, the suit belongs to the bailee, because he is answerable to the person from whom he hired."
What are the duties of the President of the           United States and of each of his Cabinet?
"What the advocates of the maxim meant was merely that a person ought not to be put on trial and compelled to answer questions to his detriment unless he had first been properly accused, i.e., by the grand jury."
"What To Do in Case of Fire A fire can usually be put out very easily when it starts, and here is an occasion when a scout can show his presence of mind and coolness."
"Whatever is left after paying the preferred stock interest is divided up equally among the shares of common stock, each getting according to his holdings."
"When a judge rules that there is no evidence of negligence, he does something more than is embraced in an ordinary ruling that there is no evidence of a fact."
"When a leader is shouting an order or message to a scout who is some way off, the scout, if he hears what is being said, should hold up his hand level with his head all the time."
"When a man foresees that harm will result from his conduct, the principle which exonerates him from accident no longer applies, and he is liable."
"When a man sues, the question is not whether he has had a cause of action in the past, but whether he has one then."
"When a person places money in a bank with no intention of checking it out for some time to come, he may have issued to him a Certificate of deposit."
"When anyone falls through some ice, throw him your Staff so that he   can grasp it like this until you can get a rope and pull him out."
"When it is a scout's duty to do something, he dare not shirk."
"When it is said that A has done all that he promised to do in the case which has happened, it is not meant that he is necessarily entitled to the same compensation as if he had done the larger amount of work."
"When Senate Consent Is Complete Early in January, 1931 the Senate requested President Hoover to return its resolution notifying him that it advised and consented to certain nominations to the Federal Power Commission."
"When the estate is settled to the satisfaction of the court, the same authority releases the administrator and his bondsmen."
"When the maker of a lost note pays the amount to the original owner, he should receive from him what is known as a bond of indemnity."
"When the queen is about to lay, she puts her head into a cell, and remains in that position for a second or two, to ascertain its fitness for the deposit which she is about to make."
"When Washington was in command at Cambridge, in January, 1776, the flag used by him consisted of a banner of {340} thirteen red and white stripes with the British Union Jack in the upper left-hand comer."
"Where no local council has been formed, application for badges should be sent direct to Headquarters, signed by the registered scout master of the troop, giving his official number."
"Where the gravity of the crime and other factors--such as the age and education of the defendant,[860] the conduct of the court or the prosecuting officials,[861] and the complicated nature of the offense charged and the possible defenses thereto[862]--render criminal proceedings without counsel so apt to result in injustice as to be fundamentally unfair, the latter group [majority] holds that the accused must have legal assistance under the amendment whether he pleads guilty or elects to stand trial, whether he requests counsel or not."
"Wherever consideration was mentioned, it was always as quid pro quo, as what the contractor was to have for his contract."
"Wounds With Severe Bleeding A scout must be prepared to check severe bleeding at once, and he should then dress the wound."
Wrist Grip Of these the simplest is the one where the wrists of the swimmer have been grasped by the drowning man in his {283} struggles.
"YORK, PA., DEC. 24, 1852."
"(27) If a free man dies intestate, his movable goods are to be distributed by his next-of-kin and friends, under the supervision of the Church."
"(a) SERIOUS WOUNDS; (b) SERIOUS BLEEDING Send for the doctor at once, and then stop the bleeding and keep as clean as possible till he arrives."
"*       *       *       *       * The women of Oregon have raised a statue to this young explorer, and there she stands in Portland, facing the Coast, pointing to the Columbia River where it reaches the sea."
"* * * When a suspect speaks because he is overborne, it is immaterial whether he has been subjected to a physical or a mental ordeal."
"* * *[958] However, a conviction before a mayor's court does not become constitutionally defective by reason of the fact that the fixed salary of the mayor is paid out of the fund to which the fines imposed by him contribute."
"* All fines that have been given to us unjustly and against the law of the land, and all fines that we have exacted unjustly, shall be entirely remitted or the matter decided by a majority judgement of the twenty-five barons referred to below in the clause for securing the peace together with Stephen, archbishop of Canterbury, if he can be present, and such others as he wishes to bring with him."
; and every good citizen should lend his hand to help in every way possible the enforcement of law in each department.
[105] One such relationship is that of a stockholder and his corporation.
"[1058] But, as shown above, a naturalized citizen is subject at any time to have his good faith in taking the oath of allegiance to the United States inquired into, and to lose his citizenship if lack of such faith is shown in proper proceedings."
"[1059] Also, a person who has become a national by naturalization may lose his nationality by having a continuous residence for three years in the territory of a foreign state of which he was formerly a national or in which the place of his birth is situated, or by having a continuous residence for five years in any other foreign state or states."
[1094] An owner aggrieved by discrimination is entitled to have his assessment reduced to the common level.
"[1103] When State action is attacked under the due process clause, the assailant usually charges also that he is denied the equal protection of the laws."
"[1109] A State law governing fraudulent transfers was found to be compatible with the act of Congress,[1110] as was a statute which provided that a discharge in bankruptcy should be unavailing to terminate the suspension of the driver's license of a person who failed to pay a judgment rendered against him for damages resulting from his negligent operation of a motor vehicle."
[1133] A statute providing that no person shall be denied opportunity for employment because he is not a member of a union does not offend the equal protection clause.
"[115] Pardons and Reprieves THE LEGAL NATURE OF A PARDON In the first case to be decided concerning the pardoning power, Chief Justice Marshall, speaking for the Court, said: As this power had been exercised from time immemorial by the executive of that nation whose language is our language, and to whose judicial institutions ours bear a close resemblance; we adopt their principles respecting the operation and effect of a pardon, and look into their books for the rules prescribing the manner in which it is to be used by the person who would avail himself of it."
"[116] However, a person cannot be deprived of his liberty under a vague statute which subjected to fine or imprisonment, as a gangster, any one not engaged in any lawful occupation, known to be a member of a gang consisting of two or more persons, and who had been convicted of a crime in any State in the Union."
"[117] Liberties Pertaining to Education (of Teachers, Parents, Pupils).--A State law forbidding the teaching in any private denominational, parochial, or public school, of any modern language, other than English, to any child who has not successfully passed the eighth grade was declared, in Meyer _v._ Nebraska[118] to be an unconstitutional interference with the right of a foreign language teacher to teach and of parents to engage him so to instruct their children."
"[1206] An accused does not, however, have a legal right to a jury composed in whole or in part of members of his own race."
"[1240] Since the possession of government insurance payable to the person of his choice, is calculated to enhance the morale of the serviceman, Congress may permit him to designate any beneficiary he desires, irrespective of State law, and may exempt the proceeds from the claims of creditors."
"[127] By close divisions, it also sustained the right of a State to forbid the conscription of neutrals by the picketing of a restaurant solely because the owner had contracted for the erection of a building (not connected with the restaurant and located some distance away) by a contractor who employed nonunion men;[128] or the picketing of a shop operated by the owner without employees to induce him to observe certain closing hours."
"[13] THE WALL OF SEPARATION DOCTRINE In 1802 President Jefferson wrote a letter to a group of Baptists in Danbury, Connecticut in which he declared that it was the purpose of the First Amendment to build a wall of separation between Church and State,[14] and in Reynolds _v._ United States,[15] the first Anti-Mormon Case, Chief Justice Waite, speaking for the unanimous Court, characterized this as almost an authoritative declaration of the scope and effect of the amendment, one which left Congress free to reach actions which were in violation of social duties or subversive of good order."
"[130] In exercising the power granted by section 5 to judge the qualifications of its own members, each House has asserted the power to inquire into the conduct of a member-elect prior to his election."
"[140] In contrast with the decision in United States _v._ Ju Toy[141] that a person seeking entrance to the United States was not entitled to a judicial hearing on his claim of citizenship, a person arrested and held for deportation is entitled to a day in court if he denies that he is an alien."
"[1437] While the Supreme Court conceded at an early date that the authority of the federal courts to entertain petitions for _habeas corpus_ derived solely from acts of Congress,[1438] a narrow majority recently asserted the right to expand the scope of the writ by judicial interpretation and to sanction its use for a purpose unknown to the common law, i.e., to bring a prisoner into court to argue his own appeal."
"[144] * * * These decisions have established the propositions that the rules of law concerning the employer's responsibility for personal injury or death of an employee arising in the course of employment are not beyond alteration by legislation in the public interest; that no person has a vested right entitling him to have these any more than other rules of law remain unchanged for his benefit; and that, if we exclude arbitrary and unreasonable changes, liability may be imposed upon the employer without fault, and the rules respecting his responsibility to one employee for the negligence of another and respecting contributory negligence and assumption of risk are subject to legislative change."
[16] An employee of the Post Office Department is not required to submit to examination by State authorities concerning his competence and to pay a license fee before performing his official duty in driving a motor truck for transporting the mail.
"[160] The right of a State to the fisheries within its borders he then held to be in the nature of a property right, held by the State for the use of the citizens thereof; the State was under no obligation to grant co-tenancy in the common property of the State, to the citizens of all the other States."
[1618] The Dartmouth College Case The third view is the one formulated by Chief Justice Marshall in his controlling opinion in Trustees of Dartmouth College _v._ Woodward.
"[1739] When the importer has so acted upon the thing imported, wrote Chief Justice Marshall, that it has become incorporated and mixed up with the mass of property in the country, it has, perhaps, lost its distinctive character as an import, and has become subject to the taxing power of the State; but while remaining the property of the importer, in his warehouse, in the original form or package in which it was imported, a tax upon it is too plainly a duty on imports, to escape the prohibition in the Constitution."
"[176] The constitutional requirement is satisfied if the nonresident is given access to the courts of the State upon terms which, in themselves, are reasonable and adequate for the enforcing of any rights he may have, even though they may not be technically the same as those accorded to resident citizens."
"[185] Justice McReynolds, speaking for the dissenting Justices, labelled the controls imposed by the challenged statute as a fanciful scheme to protect the farmer against undue exactions by prescribing the price at which milk disposed of by him at will may be resold."
"[2] At the command _Front,_ given when the ranks are aligned, each Scout turns her head and eyes to the front and drops the hand at her side."
"[20] Justice Frankfurter presented a concurring opinion for himself and Justices Jackson, Rutledge and Burton."
"[200] A person indicted a second time for the same offense is nonetheless a fugitive from justice by reason of the fact that after dismissal of the first indictment, on which he was originally indicted, he left the State with the knowledge of, or without objection by, State authorities."
[201] But a defendant cannot be extradited if he was only constructively present in the demanding State at the time of the commission of the crime charged.
[204] PROCEDURE FOR REMOVAL Only after a person has been charged with crime in the regular course of judicial proceedings is the governor of a State entitled to make demand for his return from another State.
"[209] A defendant will, however, be discharged on _habeas corpus_ if he shows by clear and satisfactory evidence that he was outside the demanding State at the time of the crime."
"[212] Similarly, measures authorizing the President to reorganize executive agencies have provided that a Reorganization Plan promulgated by him should be reported by Congress and should not become effective if one[213] or both[214] Houses adopted a resolution disapproving it."
"[22] When a person is charged with more than one crime, the right to a speedy trial does not require that he be first tried on the earliest indictment; no constitutional right is violated by removing him to another jurisdiction for trial on a later indictment."
[229] It is very true that in modern times many of the effects of either relation--master and servant or principal and agent--may be accounted for as the result of acts done by the master himself.
"[250] The case arose on indictments under section 6 of the so-called Enforcement Act of May 30, 1870,[251] which read as follows: That if two or more persons shall band or conspire together, or go in disguise upon the public highway, or upon the premises of another, with intent to violate any provision of this act, or to injure, oppress, threaten, or intimidate any citizen, with intent to prevent or hinder his free exercise and enjoyment of any right or privilege granted or secured to him by the Constitution or laws of the United States, or because of his having exercised the same, such persons shall be held guilty of felony, etc."
"[280] In an advisory opinion which it rendered for President Monroe at his request on the power of Congress to appropriate funds for public improvements, the Court answered that such appropriations might be properly made under the war and postal powers."
[309] COMMERCE TODAY Later in his opinion Marshall qualified the word intercourse with the word commercial.
[311] The holding in the Myers case boils down to the proposition that the Constitution endows the President with an illimitable power to remove all officers in whose appointment he has participated with the exception of judges of the United States.
"[312] The reticence of the Constitution respecting removal left room for four possibilities, _first_, the one suggested by the common law doctrine of estate in office, from which the conclusion followed that the impeachment power was the only power of removal intended by the Constitution; _second_, that the power of removal was an incident of the power of appointment and hence belonged, at any rate in the absence of legal or other provision to the contrary, to the appointing authority; _third_, that Congress could, by virtue of its power to make all laws which shall be necessary and proper, etc., determine the location of the removal of power; _fourth_, that the President by virtue of his executive power and his duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed, possesses the power of removal over all officers of the United States except judges."
"[324] Where property of a citizen has been mistakenly seized by the Government, converted into money and invested, the owner is entitled, in recovering compensation, to an allowance for the use of his property."
"[328] For the same reason, a State may not prevent a citizen from concluding with a foreign life insurance company at its home office a policy loan agreement whereby the policy of his life is pledged as collateral security for a cash loan to become due upon default in payment of premiums, in which case the entire policy reserve might be applied to discharge the indebtedness."
"[33] Even an individual cannot refuse to produce records which are in his custody on the plea that they might incriminate the owner or himself where the documents belong to a corporation,[34] or to a labor union."
"[34] Where a person is convicted of a crime which includes several incidents, a second trial for one of those incidents puts him twice in jeopardy."
"[34] Where a United States Senator was indicted for agreeing to receive compensation for services to be rendered in a proceeding before a government department, and it appeared that a tentative arrangement for such services was made in Illinois and confirmed in St. Louis, the defendant was properly tried in St. Louis, although he was not physically present in Missouri when notice of ratification was dispatched."
"[344] JEFFERSON'S REAL POSITION Nor did Jefferson himself officially support Madison's point of view, as the following extract from his minutes of a Conversation, which took place July 10, 1793, between himself and Citizen Genet, show: He asked if they [Congress] were not the sovereign."
[349] Said Senator Nelson of Minnesota: The President has asked us to give him the right to make war to expel the Spaniards from Cuba.
[352] CONGRESSIONAL IMPLEMENTATION OF PRESIDENTIAL POLICIES No President was ever more jealous of his prerogative in the realm of foreign relations than President Woodrow Wilson.
"[362] To recur to the case of rights acquired by prescription, every universal successor could add the time of his predecessor's adverse use to his own in order to make out the right."
[369] Water A statute making it unlawful for a riparian owner to divert water into another State does not deprive him of property without due process of law.
"[389] It is obvious that the foregoing reasoning leads to the conclusion that a disseisor of the tenant would be bound as much as the tenant himself, and this conclusion was adopted by the early law."
"[390] In short, the President's removal power, in this case unqualified, was the sanction provided by the Constitution for his power and duty to control his subordinates in all their official actions of public consequence."
"[418] And to implement such prohibition, a State has the power to declare that places where liquor is manufactured or kept shall be deemed common nuisances;[419] and even to subject an innocent owner to the forfeiture of his property for the acts of a wrongdoer."
"[42] As a means of enforcing a valid statute, the Government may require any person subject thereto to keep a record showing whether he has in fact complied with it,[43] and to submit that record to inspection by government officers."
"[436] Conversely, when President Wilson failed in March 1917 to obtain Congress's consent to his arming American merchant vessels with defensive arms, he went ahead and did it anyway, fortified not only by the known sentiments of the majority in Congress but also by the advice of his Secretary of State and Attorney General."
"[445] The doctrine dictated by the above considerations as regards the exercise of executive power in the field of legislative power was well stated by Mr John W. Davis, principal counsel on the present occasion for the steel companies, in a brief which he filed nearly forty years ago as Solicitor General, in defense of the action of the President in withdrawing certain lands from public entry although his doing so was at the time contrary to express statute."
"[45] SERVICE ON OUT-OF-STATE OWNERS OF MOTOR VEHICLES By analogy to the above cases, it has been held that a State may require nonresident owners of motor vehicles to designate an official within the State as an agent upon whom process may be served in any legal proceedings growing out of their operation of a motor vehicle within the State;[46] and while these cases arose under the Fourteenth Amendment alone, unquestionably a judgment validly obtained upon this species of service could be enforced upon the owner of a car through the courts of his home State."
"[493] In his dictum in Cohens _v._ Virginia, Chief Justice Marshall also indicated that perhaps no jurisdiction existed over suits by States to enforce their penal laws."
"[5] And in Hampton _v._ McConnell[6] some years later, Chief Justice Marshall went even further, using language which seems to show that he regarded the judgment of a State court as constitutionally entitled to be accorded in the courts of sister States not simply the faith and credit of conclusive evidence, but the validity of a final judgment."
"[52] The clause does not impair the obligation of a witness to testify if a prosecution against him is barred by lapse of time, by statutory enactment, or by a pardon;[53] but the effect of a mere tender of pardon by the President remains uncertain."
"[53] In his book, _Our Chief Magistrate and his Powers_, Ex-President Taft warmly protested against the notion that the President has any constitutional warrant to attempt the role of a Universal Providence."
"[54] A decade earlier his destined successor, Woodrow Wilson, had avowed the opinion that the President is at liberty, both in law and conscience, to be as big a man as he can."
[54] A witness may not refuse to answer questions on the ground that he would thereby expose himself to prosecution by a state.
"[542] In Baltimore and Ohio R. Co. _v._ Baugh,[543] which further projected the Tyson rule into the law of torts in disregard of State law, Justice Field wrote a sharp dissent in which he indicated an opinion that the Supreme Court's disregard of State court decisions was unconstitutional."
"[55] Conversely, the admission against a defendant in a federal court of testimony given by him in a state court under a statute of immunity is valid."
"[552] Justice Butler, joined by Justice McReynolds, concurred in the result, because in his view Tompkins was not entitled to damages under general law, but he deprecated the reversal of Swift _v._ Tyson."
"[56] If an accused takes the stand in his own behalf, he must submit to cross-examination;[57] while if he does not, it is by no means certain that the trial judge in a federal court may not, without violation of the clause, draw the jury's attention to the fact."
"[579] But when a resident policyholder's loan is merely charged against the reserve value of his policy, under an arrangement for extinguishing the debt and interest thereon by deduction from any claim under the policy, such credit is not taxable to the foreign insurance company."
[61] An individual who has acquired income by illicit means is not excused from making out an income tax return because he might thereby expose himself to a criminal prosecution by the United States.
"[64] Deploring such attempts, nullified consistently in the preceding cases, to convert the due process clause into a substantive restraint on the powers of the States, Justice Miller in Davidson _v._ New Orleans[65] obliquely counseled against a departure from the conventional application of the clause, albeit he acknowledged the difficulty of arriving at a precise, all inclusive, definition thereof."
[65] A bankrupt is not deprived of his constitutional right not to testify against himself by an order requiring him to surrender his books to a duly authorized receiver.
"[652] Unless, by its rulings of law, the State court prevented a complainant from obtaining substantially any compensation, its findings as to the amount of damages will not be overturned on appeal, even though as a consequence of error therein the property owner received less than he ought."
"[670] (2) Hearing.--The necessity and expediency of a taking being legislative questions irrespective of who may be charged with their decision, a hearing thereon need not be afforded;[671] but the mode of determining the compensation payable to an owner must be such as to furnish him with an opportunity to be heard."
"[68] 334 U.S. 378 (1948).--In a dissenting opinion filed in the case of Sherrer _v._ Sherrer, but applicable also to the case of Coe _v._ Coe, Justice Frankfurter, with Justice Murphy concurring, asserted his inability to accept the proposition advanced by the majority that regardless of how overwhelming the evidence may have been that the asserted domicile in the State offering bargain-counter divorces was a sham, the home State of the parties is not permitted to question the matter if the form of a controversy had been gone through."
"[695] Similarly, in a suit against a local partnership, in which the resident partner was duly served with process and the nonresident partner was served only with notice, a judgment thus obtained is binding upon the firm and the resident partner, but is not a personal judgment against the nonresident and cannot be enforced by execution against his individual property."
"[696] That the nonresident partner should have been so protected is attributable to the fact the process of a court of one State cannot run into another and summon a party there domiciled to respond to proceedings against him, when neither his person nor his property is within the jurisdiction of the Court rendering the judgment."
"[697] In the case of a resident, however, absence alone will not defeat the processes of courts in the State of his domicile; for domicile is deemed to be sufficient to keep him within reach of the State courts for purposes of a personal judgment, whether obtained by means of appropriate, substituted service, or by actual personal service on the resident at a point outside the State."
[728] The Burr Trial Not long afterward the Chief Justice went to Richmond to preside over the trial of Burr himself.
"[732] The Court in a five-to-four opinion by Justice Jackson in effect took the former view holding that the two-witness principle interdicted imputation of _incriminating acts_ to the accused by circumstantial evidence or by the testimony of a single witness,[733] even though the single witness in question was the accused himself."
"[735] Here it was held that although the overt acts relied upon to support the charge of treason--defendant's harboring and sheltering in his home his son who was an enemy spy and saboteur, assisting him in purchasing an automobile, and in obtaining employment in a defense plant--were all acts which a father would naturally perform for a son, this fact did not necessarily relieve them of the treasonable purpose of giving aid and comfort to the enemy."
"[764] Pleas in Abatement.--State legislation which forbids a defendant to come into court and challenge the validity of service upon him in a personal action without thereby surrendering himself to the jurisdiction of the Court, but which does not restrain him from protecting his substantive rights against enforcement of a judgment rendered without service of process, is constitutional and does not deprive him of property without due process of law."
"[817] For want of adequate enjoyment of the right to counsel, the Court, in Powell _v._ Alabama,[818] overturned the conviction of Negroes who had received sentences of death for rape, and asserted that, at least in capital cases, where the defendant is unable to employ counsel and is incapable adequately of making his own defense because of ignorance, illiteracy, or the like, it is the duty of the court, whether requested or not, to assign counsel for him as a necessary requisite of due process of Law."
"[883] Procuring a conviction for a capital crime by use of a confession extracted by protracted interrogation conducted in a similar manner was, on the authority of Chambers _v._ Florida, condemned in White _v._ Texas;[884] and in Lisenba _v._ California,[885] a case rendered inconclusive by conflicting testimony, the Court remarked, by way of dictum, that the concept of due process would void a trial in which, by threats or promises in the presence of court and jury, a defendant was induced to testify against himself, or in which a confession is used which is procured * * * by fraud, collusion, trickery and subornation or perjury."
"[888] Justice Jackson protested that interrogation _per se_ is not, * * *, an outlaw; and that inasmuch as all questioning is 'inherently coercive' * * *, the ultimate question * * * [must be] whether the confessor was in possession of his own will and self-control at the time of [his] confession."
"[89] In part, Justice Holmes's criticism of his colleagues was unfair, for his rational and fair man could not function in a vacuum, and, in appraising the constitutionality of State legislation, could no more avoid being guided by his preferences or economic predilections than were the Justices constituting the majority."
"[900] In a concurring opinion concerning the scope of the protection afforded by this clause of the Fourteenth Amendment, Justice Frankfurter contended that further argument thereon is foreclosed by Twining _v._ New Jersey, a precedent, on which he commented as follows: Decisions of this Court do not have equal intrinsic authority."
"[926] Such language appears to effect the very absorption into the Fourteenth Amendment which Justice Frankfurter rejects in the Adamson case; but he concluded by adding that as long as a State [does not] affirmatively * * * sanction * * * [arbitrary] police incursion into privacy; that is, as long as its police are deterred from making searches without authority of law by virtue of such internal discipline as an alert public opinion may induce and by reason of the statutory or common law remedies which the victims of such illegal searches may invoke, a State, without running counter to the due process clause, may employ at a trial incriminating evidence obtained by unlawful search and seizure."
"[96] THE PRESIDENT AS COMMANDER OF THE FORCES While the President customarily delegates supreme command of the forces in active service, there is no constitutional reason why he should do so; and he has been known to resolve personally important questions of military policy."
"[967] On the other hand, a prisoner who, after having been indicted on a charge of receiving stolen goods, abides by the prosecutor's suggestion and pleads guilty to the lesser offense of attempted second degree grand larceny, cannot later contend that a judgment of guilty of the latter offense was lacking in due process in that it amounted to a conviction of a crime for which he had never been indicted."
_But she must remember to obey first and complain afterward._ =VIII.
"_Carelessness at Home._ As for example, starting the fire with kerosene; leaving gas jets burning where curtains of clothing may be blown into the flame; leaving clothing or paper too near a fire; throwing matches you thought had been put out into paper or other material which will catch fire easily; leaving oily or greasy rags where they will easily overheat or take fire spontaneously; leaving objects on stairs and in hallways which will cause others to fall; leaving scalding water where a child may fall into it or pull it down, spilling the scalding water over himself; leaving rags or linoleum with upturned edges for someone to fall over; and innumerable other careless things which will occur to you."
_Compass_: Every scout should learn how to use his watch as a compass.
"_Keep Clean_--A Girl Scout should be sure that the air, water and food that she allows to enter her body are clean."
"_See also_ his words in Satterlee _v._ Matthewson, 2 Pet."
"_Stand Tall_--Every Scout should be recognized a long way off, not only by her uniform, but by her erect carriage."
"_Treatment_--Send for a doctor at once, and if it will be possible for him to arrive soon, make the patient as comfortable as possible and wait for him."
"_Wrist Grip_--If the drowning person grasps the rescuer's wrists, the rescuer throws both hands above his head, which forces both low in the water, and then turns the leverage of his arms against the other's thumbs and breaks the grip."
"{312} Siberian Man Hunt One scout as fugitive runs away across the snow in any direction he may please until he finds a good hiding place, and there conceals himself."
"14) did not prevent President Lincoln from promulgating in April, 1863 a code of rules to govern the conduct in the field of the armies of the United States which was prepared at his instance by a commission headed by Francis Lieber and which later became the basis of all similar codifications both here and abroad."
"19, 32-33 (1827), asserting the finality of the President's judgment of the existence of a state of facts requiring his exercise of the powers conferred by the act of 1795."
"409 (1792), in which the Court rejected Attorney General Randolph's contention that he had the right _ex officio_ to move for a writ of _mandamus_ ordering the United States circuit court for Pennsylvania to put the Invalid Pension Act into effect."
"83 n., 93, 94, 101-103, 130."
"967) Congress added a new section to existing _habeas corpus_ provisions which stipulated that no application for a writ of _habeas corpus_ by a person in custody pursuant to a judgment of a State court shall be granted until the applicant has exhausted the remedies available in the courts of the States and that an applicant shall not be deemed to have exhausted State remedies if he has the right under State law to raise, by any available procedure, the question presented, 28 U.S.C.A."
A BILL OF SALE This is a written agreement by which one person transfers to another his interest in certain personal property.
"A carpenter need not go to work upon another man's house at all, but if he accepts the other's confidence and intermeddles, he cannot stop at will and leave the roof open to the weather."
"A clerk shall not be amerced in respect of his lay holding except after the manner of the others aforesaid; further, he shall not be amerced in accordance with the extent of his ecclesiastical benefice."
A debtor's sureties shall not be distrained upon so long as the debtor himself can discharge his debt.
A decree _pro confesso_ entered against a defendant after striking his answer from the files for contempt of court is void.
A defendant could clear himself of the felony by their oath that he had bought or received the thing openly in the way appointed by law.
"A depositor, when opening an account with a bank is required to place his signature in a book kept for the purpose."
A girl who saves more than she spends may be niggardly; a girl who spends more than she saves may go in debt.
A handkerchief held in front of you in your outstretched hands will generally cause the dog to stop to paw it before he attempts to bite you.
A judge who has long sat at nisi prius ought gradually to acquire a fund of experience which enables him to represent the common sense of the community in ordinary instances far better than an average jury.
"A layman, the Court added, is usually no match for the skilled prosecutor whom he confronts in the court room."
"A man bought a safe, and then, wishing to sell it again, sent it to the defendant, and gave him leave to keep his books in it until sold."
"A pain can be inflicted upon the wrong-doer, of a sort which does not restore the injured party to his former situation, or to another equally good, but which is inflicted for the very purpose of causing pain."
"A person having money in bank and wishing to draw for his own use, makes his check payable to self or to cash."
"A person may be falling and in trying to save himself catch hold of something in such a way that he feels a sharp, sudden, severe pain, and may even feel the head of the bone slip out at the shoulder or elbow."
"A proviso in section 8 of the Federal Corrupt Practices Act fixing a maximum authorized expenditure by a candidate for Senator in any campaign for his nomination and election, as applied to a primary election, _held_ not supported by article I, section 4, giving Congress power to regulate the manner of holding elections for Senators and Representatives."
A Scout farmer may have her chief interest in rearing animals but she should know something about the main business of the farmer which is tilling the soil.
A scout ought to be loyal to all to whom he has obligations.
A scout ought to insist on his scout master going to camp.
A scout should remember not to expose himself too much to the sun nor should he wear too heavy clothing in the summer.
A scout's honor will not permit him to disobey in the slightest particular the sanitary rules of his camp.
"A scout's self-respect will cause him to value his own standing and make him sympathetic toward others who may be, on the one hand, worse off, or, on the other hand, better off as far as wealth is concerned."
"A servant is denied possession, not from any peculiarity of intent with regard to the things in his custody, either towards his master or other people, by which he is distinguished [228] from a depositary, but simply as one of the incidents of his status."
"A slave's possession was his owner's possession on the practical ground of the owner's power over him, and from the fact that the slave had no standing before the law."
"A State cannot denationalize a foreign subject who has not complied with federal naturalization law and constitute him a citizen of the United States, or of the State, so as to deprive the federal courts of jurisdiction over a controversy between him and a citizen of a State."
"A tame cat that was highly trained to do anything a cat could do, was selected as promising for a black track study, and her owner's two boys volunteered to get all the cat tracks I needed."
"A tenant for years intends to exclude all persons, including the owner, until the end of his term; yet he has not the animus domini in the sense explained."
"A writer in a Pennsylvania paper, under the signature of TAMONY, has asserted that the king of Great Britain owes his prerogative as commander-in-chief to an annual mutiny bill."
"A young girl of my acquaintance, he says, was greatly afraid of bees, but was completely cured of her fear by the following incident."
"About 24 hours must elapse before it will be safe to introduce a strange mother into a queenless hive; and even then, if she is not fertile, she will run a great risk of being destroyed."
"Acts of lawless violence, or of threatened violence to the citizen or his property, cannot be anticipated and provided for; and the protection, to be effectual or of any avail, may, not unfrequently, require the most prompt and decided action."
"Admiral Farragut is reported as giving this explanation, in the late years of his life, of his success in the service of his country It was all owing to a resolution that I formed when I was ten years old."
"After the tourniquet is on and bleeding is stopped, if the patient is very weak, he may have a teaspoonful of aromatic spirits of ammonia in half a glass of water."
"Again Justice Frankfurter spoke for the Court, while reiterating his preachments regarding the tolerance claimable by the States under the Fourteenth Amendment[933] he held that methods offensive to human dignity were ruled out by the due process clause."
"Again, it might be said that, if the defendant's intent or neglect was essential to his liability, the absence of both would deprive his act of the character of a trespass, and ought therefore to be admissible under the general issue."
"Again, the real substance of the defence is not that the damage [139] was not intended,--that would be no defence at all; but that, whether it was intended or not,--that is, even if the defendant foresaw it and foresaw it with pleasure,--the manifest facts and circumstances under which he said it were such that the law considered the damage to the plaintiff of less importance than the benefit of free speaking."
"Alfred, 36, providing for the case of a man's staking himself on a spear carried by another, we read, Let this (liability) be if the point be three fingers higher than the hindmost part of the shaft; if they be both on a level,... be that without danger."
"All day long he climbed saying to himself, I will sleep tonight in the teepee of the sun, and he will tell me whence I come and whither I go."
Allah reckons not against a man's allotted time the days he spends in the chase.
"Also in meeting a woman or child, a scout, as a matter of course, should always make way for them even if he himself has to step off the sidewalk into the mud."
"Also when a prisoner's petition for release on the grounds of the unconstitutionally of his conviction has been rejected by a State court, a petition for certiorari addressed to the United States Supreme Court will be denied whenever it appears that the prisoner had not invoked the appropriate State remedy."
"Although Chief Justice Marshall regarded the rule-making power as essentially legislative in nature, he ruled that Congress could delegate to the courts the power to vary minor regulations in the outlines marked out by the statute."
"Although compulsory processes of justice may be used to call the accused as a witness and to require him to testify, compulsion by torture to extort a confession is a different matter."
"Although the Georgia statute prohibited the defendant from testifying under oath, it did not prevent him from entering an unsworn denial both of the contract and of the receipt of any cash advancement thereunder, a factor which, the Court emphasized, was no more controlling than the customary rule of evidence in the Bailey Case."
Always consult a foot specialist for treatment and buy plates if needed on his order.
"Always get the services of a physician as soon as possible, but do not wait for him to come."
Always let a patient try it herself with her hand and arm before getting in.
"An American citizen, it continued, owes allegiance to the United States wherever he may reside, and dual nationality does not alter the situation."
"An application for an injunction to forbid President Johnson to enforce the Reconstruction Acts, on the ground of their unconstitutionality, was answered by Attorney General Stanbery as follows: It is not upon any peculiar immunity that the individual has who happens to be President; upon any idea that he cannot do wrong; upon any idea that there is any particular sanctity belonging to him as an individual, as is the case with one who has royal blood in his veins; but it is on account of the office that he holds that I say the President of the United States is above the process of any court or the jurisdiction of any court to bring him to account as President."
An illustration may be found in the parallel mode of dealing with the prisoner himself.
"An instrument under seal, by which a person binds himself, his heirs or assigns, to do or not to do certain things."
"An interesting concurring opinion was filed by Justice Douglas for himself and Justice Black: It is not enough, says Justice Douglas, that an article is new and useful."
An owner is not bound at his peril to keep his cattle from harming his neighbor's person.
"An owner out of possession could sue the wrongful taker of his property, as well as one who had possession."
"And in curious contrast with the principle as inverted to meet still more modern views of public policy, if the animal was of a wild nature, that is, in the very case of the most ferocious animals, the owner ceased to be liable the moment it escaped, because at that moment he ceased to be owner."
"AND she must also have planted and cultivated a small vegetable garden like the one described in the Handbook, in the Section The Girl Scout's Own Garden OR B."
"And so we Scouts, not to lose this great spirit, study the stars and the sun and the trees and try to learn a few of the wood secrets she knew so well."
"And, therefore, each generation as it comes and goes must rise or fall in proportion as it raises or lowers the citizenship standard, for each generation must prove its own worth as must each individual his own virtues."
Another way to remind himself is to wear his scout badge reversed until he has done his good turn.
"Any bee-keeper can easily experiment with my hives: but I would recommend him to do so, at first, on a small scale, and if profit is his object, to follow the directions furnished in this treatise, until he is _sure_ that he has discovered others which are preferable."
Anyone may sell postage stamps as he would any other personal asset.
"Apart from the extremes just mentioned, it is now easy to see how the point at which a man's conduct begins to be at his own peril is generally fixed."
"ARTIFICIAL RESPIRATION If the apparently drowned person is to be saved, no time must be lost in the rescue from the water or in getting the water out of him, and breathing re-established after he is brought to land."
"As early as 1831 we find an Attorney-General arguing before the Supreme Court that, in performance of the trust enjoined upon him by the faithful execution clause, the President not only may, but ... is bound to avail himself of every appropriate means not forbidden by law."
"As has been said, the heir ceased to be the general representative of his ancestor at an early date."
"As stated by Justice Jackson, when the Court refused to review an order of the Civil Aeronautics Board, which in effect was a mere recommendation to the President for his final action, To revise or review an administrative decision which has only the force of a recommendation to the President would be to render an advisory opinion in its most obnoxious form--advice that the President has not asked, tendered at the demand of a private litigant, on a subject concededly within the President's exclusive, ultimate control."
"As the President himself had requested the resolution, the episode supports the theory that international conventions to which the United States is party, even those terminable on notice, are terminable only by act of Congress."
"As to sale by a member of one of the village communities: The purchaser steps exactly into his place, and takes up all his obligations."
"at most for the entire knight's `fee', and any man that owes less shall pay less, in accordance with the ancient usage of `fees' (3) But if the heir of such a person is under age and a ward, when he comes of age he shall have his inheritance without `relief' or fine."
"At the outset of his opinion for the Court, Chief Justice Taft stated the general proposition that Congress can certainly regulate interstate commerce to the extent of forbidding and punishing the use of such commerce as an agency to promote immorality, dishonesty or the spread of any evil or harm to the people of other States from the State of origin."
"Back Strangle The back strangle hold is an awkward one to break and one which must be broken without an instant's delay, or the would-be rescuer himself will be in great need of help."
Banks have facilities for the safe-guarding of money which the ordinary business man could not provide for himself.
"Before long, they will cultivate an acquaintance, by thrusting their antenn through to her; so that, when she is liberated the next day, they will gladly adopt her in place of the one they have lost."
"Before the deed is signed and delivered, the buyer should know that he is getting a clear title to the property described in the conveyance."
"Bruns says, as the spirit of the Kantian theory required him to say, that this is a sacrifice of principle to convenience."
"Burdick, nevertheless, refused to accept the pardon and persisted in his contumacy with the unanimous support of the Supreme Court."
"But a good Scout laughs at this idea, for she knows that these things are expected of all decent people."
"But as the law has grown, even when its standards have continued to model themselves upon those of morality, they have necessarily become external, because they have considered, not the actual condition of the particular defendant, but whether his conduct would have been wrong in the fair average member of the community, whom he is expected to equal at his peril."
But every opinion which a juror may entertain does not necessarily disqualify him.
"But if subjects of the king broke the prison, the defendant would be liable, for they are not enemies, but traitors, and then, it is implied, the defendant would have a right of action against them, and therefore would himself be answerable."
"But in a republic, where every magistrate ought to be personally responsible for his behavior in office the reason which in the British Constitution dictates the propriety of a council, not only ceases to apply, but turns against the institution."
"But it is also true that the Amendment does not prohibit an elector's announcing his choice beforehand, pledging himself."
"But it often happens, especially in modern law, that a person acquires and is allowed to enforce a special right, although that facts which give rise to it are not true of him, or are true of him only in part."
"But just as we have seen that the executor is still said to represent the person of his testator, the heir was said to represent the person of his ancestor in the time of Edward I."
"But notwithstanding this fact, the average public Mind Reader, in spite of his sensational additions, generally gives his audience enough of the real thing to render his performance of sufficient scientific interest to make it worthy of attendance by the earnest student of the subject."
"But notwithstanding this per totam curiam, the defendant shall be charged on his general receipt at York, according to Southcote's Case."
But she does not salute when she herself           is singing.
But the act of walking does not throw the peril of all possible consequences upon him.
"But, according to the testimony, the defendant signed without knowing that the plaintiff was to alter his position in any way on the faith of the signature, and it was held that, if that story was believed, there was no consideration."
"But, again, suppose that the vessel, instead of being under lease, is in charge of a pilot whose employment is made compulsory by the laws of the port which she is just entering."
"By breathing a little loud the other person will catch your time, so that it is not necessary for you to instruct him in the science or theory of Rhythmic Breathing."
"CAPITALISTS The capitalist not only has money of his own to invest, but he may and very often does need more money properly to exploit the enterprises in which he is engaged."
Certain well defined duties to perform for her Patrol.
"Chief Justice [183] Popham probably borrowed his distinction between paid and unpaid bailees from that work, where common carriers are mentioned as an example of the former class."
"Close stoves he     has most appropriately styled little demons, and impure air The     favorite poison of America."
"Coke, in his Commentary on Littleton (385 a), takes a distinction between a warranty, which binds the party to yield lands in recompense, and a covenant annexed to the land, which is to yield but damages."
"confidence, and privity:... as I say, if there be not privity or confidence, [408] then there can be no use: and hence if the feoffees make a feoffment to one who has notice of the use, now the law will adjudge him seised to the first use, since there is sufficient privity between the first feoffor and him, for if he [i.e."
"Congress may provide for immediate seizure of property which the President or his agent determines to be enemy property, leaving the question of enemy ownership to be settled later at the suit of a claimant."
"CONGRESSIONAL REPEAL OF TREATIES It is in respect to his contention that when it is asked to carry a treaty into effect Congress has the constitutional right, and indeed the duty, to determine the matter according to its own ideas of what is expedient, that Madison has been most completely vindicated by developments."
"Corruption of blood as a result of attainder of treason was cited as an example of the former and was defined as the disability of any of the posterity of the attainted person to claim any inheritance in fee simple, either as heir to him, or to any ancestor above him."
"de sa cure; and upon this argument the writ was adjudged good, Thorpe, J. saying that he had seen a man indicted for killing a patient by want of care (default in curing), whom he had undertaken to cure."
"Demonstrate ability to observe quickly and           accurately by describing the contents of a room or           a shop window, _or_ a table with a number of           objects upon it, after looking a short time, (not           more than ten seconds); _or_ describe a passer-by           so that another person could identify him; _or_           prove ability to make a quick rough report on the           appearance and landmarks of a stretch of country,           not to exceed one-quarter of a mile and to be           covered in not more than five minutes."
"Dies in her fourth year, 52."
"Diplomacy, they said, was now at an end and the President himself had appealed to Congress to provide a solution for the Cuban situation."
"Do not give an unconscious person a stimulant, as he cannot swallow, and it will run down his windpipe and choke him."
Doubtless it was the very hardships of life that made him what he was.
Dzierzon appears to have been the first to ascertain the truth on this subject; and his discovery must certainly be ranked as unfolding one of the most astonishing facts in all the range of animated nature.
Dzierzon modestly disclaimed the idea of having attained perfection in his hive.
Each scout must collect and hand in his tennis balls after the game.
"Each Scout should carry her knapsack on her back, to leave the hands free."
Earlier Justice Jackson had declared that this phase of treason consists of two elements: adherence to the enemy; and rendering him aid and comfort.
"Early in October, 1950 President Harold Stassen of the University of Pennsylvania announced that he had written Premier Stalin offering to confer with him respecting issues between the two governments."
"EDIBLE WILD PLANTS No one truly knows the woods until he can find with certainty a number of wild plants that furnish good food for man in the season when food is scarce; that is, in the winter or early spring."
Evening red and morning gray           Sends the traveler on his way.
"Every colony which has a new queen, should be watched, in order that the Apiarian may be seasonably apprised of her loss."
"Every farmer and gardener must cultivate his crops and fight the weeds which are always crowding out the plants he is trying to raise, and in this fight he is helped by a great many birds of various kinds."
Every good citizen should feel that his public duty is an important private business.
"Every one agrees that it is not necessary to have always a present power over the thing, otherwise one could only possess what was under his hand."
"Fits A person in a fit first has convulsive movements of the body, then he usually becomes unconscious."
"For fear that any of my readers might suspect Mr Holbrook of looking at the white clover, through a pair of _bee-spectacles_, I would add that although he has ten acres of it in mowing, he has no bees, and has never particularly interested himself in this branch of rural economy."
For it can hardly be supposed that a man's responsibility for the consequences of his acts varies as the remedy happens to fall on one side or the other of the penumbra which separates trespass from the action on the case.
for the Roman Caesar upon his lips.
"From the account Dr. Berg gave me, I felt assured that you had devised substantially the _same system_ as that so successfully pursued by Mr Dzierzon; but how far _your hive_ resembled his I was unable to judge from description alone."
"From this it was but a step to extend the same form of action to all cases of loss by a bailee, and so avoid the defendant's right to wage his law."
"General Suggestions If the Girl Scout who is preparing for her examination will look back over the menus which have been suggested, she will notice that milk is emphasized."
Great cleanliness is necessary not only for her own protection but to prevent illness spreading.
"Hard spurring is just so much more likely to lead to harm than merely riding a horse in the street, that the court thought that the defendant would be bound to look out for the consequences of the one, while it would not hold him liable for those resulting merely from the other; [94] because the possibility of being run away with when riding quietly, though familiar, is comparatively slight."
"Have attracted at least three kinds of birds, exclusive of the English sparrow, to a lunch counter which he has supplied."
"Having acquired a knowledge of their habits, not a bee will buzz in his ear, without recalling to him some of these lessons, and helping to make him a wiser and a better man."
"He alighted on a branch ten feet above my head and just over the rabbit remains, and sat there muttering in his throat."
"He is ignorant, that is to say, that the true owner either has or claims any interest in the property in question, and therefore he does not intend a wrongful act, because he does not mean to deal with his neighbor's property."
He wrote: I am aware of course that the word intent as vaguely used in ordinary legal discussion means no more than knowledge at the time of the act that the consequences said to be intended will ensue.
"Health is probably a woman's greatest capital, and a Girl Scout looks after it and saves it, and doesn't waste it by poor diet and lack of exercise and fresh air, so that she goes bankrupt before she is thirty."
"Hence A could not simply wait till the end of his term, and then recover the full amount which he would have had if the employment had continued."
"Hence I say that it is important to show that a far more developed, more rational, and mightier body of law than the Roman, gives no sanction to either premise or conclusion as held by Kant and his successors."
"Here it plainly appears that the buyer knows exactly what he is going to get, and therefore that the mistake of color has no bearing on the bargain."
His article concludes as follows:     Pale countrymen and countrywomen rouse yourselves!
Hitherto philosophers have claimed our admiration of nature for her care in preserving and multiplying the species.
"Horace Mann was opposed to sectarian doctrinal instruction in the schools, but he repeatedly urged the teaching of the elements of religion common to all of the Christian sects."
How could the Senate confer a benefit upon the President by the manner of employing their right of negative upon his nominations?
HOW TO DRAW MONEY A savings bank depositor may either draw money himself or through some properly authorized person.
"HOW TO PREPARE A CHECK A check may be defined to be a written order on a bank directing it to pay a certain sum of money to the person named in the check or to his order, and signed by a depositor."
"How, in short, can a man sue or be sued on a promise in which he had no part?"
"However, a compensation award by State A to a resident employee of a resident employer injured on the job in State B will not preclude State B from awarding added compensation under its own laws, when the compensation statute of State A does not expressly exclude recovery under a law of the State in which the injury occurred and when the State A award incorporated a private settlement contract wherein the employee reserved his rights in State B."
"However, in a recent civil suit, a United States District Court judge asserted his belief, by way of dictum, that protection against unreasonable searches and seizures, invasion of freedom of speech and press, unlawful and unwarranted incarcerations, arrests, and _failure to allow reasonable bail_ would all be fundamental rights protected by [the Fourteenth] Amendment from State invasion."
"Huber has paid the most admirable tribute to his intelligence, fidelity and indomitable patience, energy and skill."
Huber thus speaks of the pacific effect produced upon the bees by the use of his leaf hive.
"Huber, after his splendid discoveries in the physiology of the bee, perceived at once, the importance of multiplying colonies by some method more reliable than that of natural swarming."
"Huber, in one of his experiments, found twenty-four in one hive, and even a larger number has sometimes been reared by a single colony."
"Huon starts upon the task, leaving twelve of his knights as hostages."
"Hyginus, who flourished before Columella, had evidently noticed the royal jelly; for he speaks of cells larger than those of the common bees, filled as it were with a solid substance of a _red color_, out of which the winged king is at first formed."
"I do not know that I can better illustrate the importance of the inexperienced Apiarian following carefully my directions, than by supposing him to return the queen to the colony to which she does not belong."
"I gave           it to Mr Mason soon after it was written, and           have since learned that he greatly admired it."
"I have frequently, by holding a queen in the closed hand, caused her to make the same noise."
I once removed a queen in such a manner as to cause the bees to take wing and fill the air in search of her.
I resume the quotation from Huish; If we examine the account which Huber gives of his invention (!)
"I should like now to express our thanks and appreciation to Dr. Corwin and to his collaborators from the Service, Dr. Norman J."
"I submitted a portion of the royal jelly for analysis, to Dr. Charles M. Wetherill, of Philadelphia; a very interesting account of his examination may be found in the proceedings of the Phila."
"I then gave them a fertile queen, but she met with no better treatment."
"I watched their proceedings with great interest; they actually paid very unusual attention to this crippled queen, and treated her more as they are wont to treat a fertile one."
"If a governor of New York, therefore, should be at the head of any such conspiracy, until the design had been ripened into actual hostility he could insure his accomplices and adherents an entire impunity."
"If a man's business reputation is good, and the banks keep well posted in such matters, he may secure a loan on his own note, though even in such cases the name of a good endorser is required."
If a person who cannot write makes a note his mark should be properly witnessed.
"If a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as President until a President shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein neither a President elect nor a Vice President elect shall have qualified, declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President or Vice President shall have qualified."
"If a scout discovers a building to be on fire, he should sound the alarm for the fire department at once."
"If a scout meets one of another religion, he should remember that he, too, is striving for the best."
"If a scout should be employed in such a place, he might make himself very serviceable in case of a fire, because having thought of it beforehand, he would know what to do--his motto being, Be Prepared."
"If a tenant should promise to make repairs, and the landlord should promise to furnish him wood for the purpose, it is believed that at the present day, whatever may have been the old decisions, the tenant's duty to repair would be dependent upon the landlord's furnishing the material when required."
"If an heir at law, say a child, is not mentioned in the will, the law assumes that he was forgotten by the testator and generally gives the share the heir would be entitled to if there were no will."
"If an inexperienced person wishes to commence bee-keeping, I advise him, by all means, to purchase a new swarm of bees."
"If another person's clothing catches fire, throw him to the ground and smother the fire with a coat, blanket, or rug."
"If any of the promised traits are wanting in the thing tendered, the buyer may refuse to accept, not merely on the ground that he has not [336] been offered the equivalent for keeping his promise, but also on the ground that he never promised to accept what is offered him."
"If every Girl Scout in America realized that she might make all the difference, some day, between a bankrupt family and a family with a comfortable margin laid aside for a rainy day, she would give a great deal of attention to this Scout law."
"If every good citizen could be brought to see that his private interests are closely linked with public affairs, he would take more interest in the local politics of his town and county, and so have a voice in the expenditure of taxes by selecting the best men to do the work for him."
"If he hits him, a chip goes into that person's hat; if not, a chip goes into his own."
"If he misses, the second hunter may step up five paces, and have his shot."
"If it be said they might sometimes gratify him by an acquiescence in a favorite choice, when public motives might dictate a different conduct, I answer, that the instances in which the President could be personally interested in the result, would be too few to admit of his being materially affected by the compliances of the Senate."
"If it is the hider who kills the rabbit, the hunter adds ten points to his score."
"If proof be added that the defendant knew of his son's instructions, preparation and plans, the purpose to aid and comfort the enemy becomes clear."
"If running a man down is a trespass when the accident can be referred to the rider's act of spurring, why is it not a tort in every case, as was argued in Vincent v. Stinehour, seeing that it can always be referred more remotely to his act of mounting and taking the horse out?"
"If such there be, go mark him well;     High though his titles, proud his fame,     Boundless his wealth as wish can claim,     The wretch, concentered all in self,     Living, shall forfeit fair renown,     And doubly dying, shall go down     To the vile dust from whence he sprung     Unwept, unhonored, and unsung."
"If the case should only be, that he MIGHT lay it down, unless continued by a new choice, and if he should be desirous of being continued, his wishes, conspiring with his fears, would tend still more powerfully to corrupt his integrity, or debase his fortitude."
"If the defendant knew a present fact (the other party's intent), which, according to common experience, made it likely that his act would have the harmful consequence, he is chargeable, whether he in fact foresaw the consequence or not."
"If the defendant lighted an ordinary fire in a fireplace in an adjoining house, having no knowledge that the fireplace was unsafely constructed, the court would probably rule that he was not liable."
"If the defendant was a servant not having control over the goods, he might not fall within the law of bailment, and factors are treated on the footing of servants in the early law."
"If the executor represents the person of the testator, there is no longer any trouble in allowing him to sue or be sued on his testator's contracts."
"If the finder is within ten yards on sighting the deer, and misses his shot, the other hunters go back to the ten-yard limit."
"If the former ground is adopted, it admits that a single person may sacrifice another to himself, and a fortiori that a people may."
"If the hunter fails to find all the rabbits, he scores twenty-five for each one he gives up."
"If the liability of a master for the torts of his servant had hitherto been recognized by the courts as the decaying remnant of an obsolete institution, it would not be surprising to find it confined to the cases settled by ancient precedent."
"If the maker of such a note refuses to pay on the expiration of time stated, he is liable for the amount without any notification."
"If the scout becomes dizzy and exhausted through exposure to the sun he should find a cool place, lie down, and bathe the face, hands, and chest in cold water and drink freely of cold water."
"If the student wishes to do so, he may invent a dozen similar feats, just as sensational and just as effective."
"If the table is used, you should stand before it, the Transmitter in his usual place."
"If the tax be not paid, the property of the delinquent may be sold, and he be thus deprived of his property."
"If the tenant fails to leave the property when his lease has expired, the owner may make his demand through what is known as a notice to quit, which must be served on the tenant in person."
"If the time is not specified, a partner may withdraw whenever he pleases."
"If the wife of the grantor is to sign, her name should follow that of her husband."
"If then a contract can be sold, if a buyer can add the time of his seller's adverse user to his own, what is the machinery by which the law works out the result?"
"If they incur a fine to the king and run away, the lord has to pay it unless he can clear himself of complicity."
"If this fails, pull the upper lid over the lower two or three times, close the nostril on the opposite side and have the patient blow his nose hard."
"If this were carried out logically, it would follow that an agent constituted to hold possession in his principal's name would not be regarded as having the legal possession, or as entitled to trespass."
"If you are about to hire a stranger, it adds to your confidence and to his chances if he have a testimonial as to character and fitness from his last employer, or from some man whose word you value."
"If you see the queen, you may give the hive in which you put her, three or four times as many bees as any other; and the next day it may be strengthened with a few combs containing brood, just ready to mature."
"If you tie the hands of an insensible person together with a handkerchief and put them over your head, you will find it fairly easy to crawl along the floor dragging him with you."
"If your Transmitter does not seem to be Concentrating properly, you should speak to him firmly, but kindly, about it."
"If, for lack of means, the debtor is unable to discharge his debt, his sureties shall be answerable for it."
"If, however, the heir of any of the aforesaid has been under age and in wardship, let him have his inheritance without relief and without fine when he comes of age."
"If, however, the horse had been unruly, and had been taken into a frequented place for the purpose of being broken, the owner might have been liable, because it was his fault to bring a wild horse into a place where mischief might probably be done."
"II c. 2 (1679), where a person was detained pursuant to a conviction by a court having jurisdiction of the subject matter, _habeas corpus_ was available only if a want of jurisdiction appeared on the face of the record of the Court which convicted him."
"III and IV, for evidence of a judicial recognition of an inventor's inchoate right to have his invention patented."
"In 1859, when he was beginning to gain some recognition as a national figure, he was asked to write a little sketch of his life, and in the letter enclosing it he said: There is not much of it, for the reason, I suppose, there is not much of me."
"In a dissenting opinion in which Justices Douglas, Murphy and Rutledge concurred, Justice Black said, I cannot agree that a State can lawfully bar from a semipublic position a well-qualified man of good character solely because he entertains a religious belief which might prompt him at some time in the future to violate a law which has not yet been and may never be enacted."
In addition to these the scout should be a lover of his country.
"In Brown _v._ Maryland,[553] Chief Justice Marshall, had remarked at the close of his opinion, We suppose the principles laid down in this case, apply equally to importations from a sister State."
"In consequence of his power to receive and dispatch diplomatic agents, but more especially the former, the President possesses the power to recognize new States, communities claiming the status of belligerency, and changes of government in established states; also, by the same token, the power to decline recognition, and thereby decline diplomatic relations with such new States or governments."
"In contrast, there is ample justification for a legislative judgment that the conspiracy now before us is a substantial threat to national order and security,[224] which seems to be in essential agreement with the position of the Chief Justice and his three associates."
"In England, if the plaintiff had not something to show for his debt, the defendant's denial turned him out of court; and even if he had, he was liable to be defeated by the defendant's swearing with some of his friends to back him that he owed nothing."
"In England, the King possessed the power of raising armies in the time of peace according to his own good pleasure."
"In favor of A, the contract is conditional on B's keeping his agreement to employ him."
"In Frohwerk _v._ United States[87] he said: With regard to the argument [on the constitutional question] we think it necessary to add to what has been said in Schenck _v._ United States, * * *, only that the First Amendment while prohibiting legislation against free speech as such cannot have been, and obviously was not, intended to give immunity for every possible use of language."
"In Gordon _v._ United States,[17] the Court refused to hear an appeal, probably for the reasons given in Chief Justice Taney's opinion which he did not deliver because of his death before the Court reconvened but which was published many year later."
"In Graves _v._ Elliott,[530] decided in the same year, the Court upheld the power of New York, in computing its estate tax, to include in the gross estate of a domiciled decedent the value of a trust of bonds managed in Colorado by a Colorado trust company and already taxed on its transfer by Colorado, which trust the decedent had established while in Colorado and concerning which he had never exercised any of his reserved powers of revocation or change of beneficiaries."
"In his dissenting opinion in New State Ice Co. _v._ Liebmann, 285 U.S. 202, 302-303 (1932), Justice Brandeis had also observed that: The notion of a distinct category of business 'affected with a public interest' employing property 'devoted to a public use' rests upon historical error."
"In his first annual message (December 4, 1865), President Johnson had asked Congress to prevent any selfish impediment [by the States] to the free circulation of men and merchandise."
"In neither case is the President entitled to force his reading of the law upon the officer, but only to take care that the latter exercise his powers according to his own best lights."
"In one the conviction of a Baptist minister for conducting religious services in the streets of New York City without first obtaining a permit from the city police commissioner was overturned,[58] a permit having been refused him on the ground that he had in the past ridiculed other religious beliefs thereby stirring strife and threatening violence."
"In order to get this ancient god's attention, it was necessary to grip him by his forelock, for when he had passed, nothing could check his speed."
"In our country, foreign representatives are received by the President at the White House, or by the secretary of state in his office apartments."
In severe shock the person is completely unconscious or he may be only slightly confused and feel weak and uncertain of what has happened.
"In Solesbee _v._ Balkcom, 339 U.S. 9 (1950), the Court declined to intervene in case coming up from Georgia in which appellant, claiming that he had become insane following conviction and sentence of death, sought a postponement of execution from the governor of the State."
"In Sturges _v._ Crowninshield,[1597] decided in 1819, Marshall defines obligation of contract as the law which binds the parties to perform their agreement; but a little later the same year he sets forth the points presented for consideration in Trustees of Dartmouth College _v._ Woodward[1598] to be: 1."
"In such a matter no authority is more deserving of respect than that of Chief Justice Shaw, for the strength of that great judge lay in an accurate appreciation of the requirements of the community whose officer he was."
"In such cases the defendant's body is file passive instrument of an external force, and the bodily motion relied on by the plaintiff is not his act at all."
"In the course of the debate on the act to establish a Department of Foreign Affairs (later changed to Department of State) all of these views were put forward, with the final result that a clause was incorporated in the measure which implied, as pointed out above, that the head of the department would be removable by the President at his discretion."
"In the curious case of Ex parte Levitt, Petitioner, 302 U.S. 633 (1937), the Court was asked to purge itself of Justice Black on the ground that his appointment to it violated the second clause of section 6 of Article I."
"In the exercise of its discretion, it may issue a warrant for the arrest of a witness to procure his testimony, without previous subpoena, if there is good reason to believe that otherwise such witness would not be forthcoming."
"In the First Employers' Liability Cases, (Howard _v._ Illinois Central R. Co., 207 U.S. 463 (1908)), the majority of the Court, speaking through Justice White, gave special attention to the Government's argument that though the act, in terms, governed the liability of every interstate carrier to any of its employees, whether engaged in interstate commerce or not when the liability fell, it was none the less constitutional because one who engaged in interstate commerce thereby submits all his business concerns to the regulating power of Congress."
"In the general course of human nature, a power over a man's subsistence amounts to a power over his will."
"In the latter part of Summer, the Apiarian may take away from the main hive, some of the combs which contain the best honey, and replace them with combs into which he has poured the cheaper article; or if he has no spare combs on hand, he may slice off the covers of the cells, drain out the honey, fill the empty combs with West India honey, and return them to the bees: giving them at the same time, the additional food which they need to elaborate wax to seal them over."
"In the national government, if the Senate should be divided, no appointment could be made; in the government of New York, if the council should be divided, the governor can turn the scale, and confirm his own nomination."
"In the protest formal objection is made against the breaking of the promise, and demanding that the matter be set right by the maker, or on his failure, by the indorser."
In the quit-claim deed the grantor conveys to the purchaser his interest in or right to the property under consideration.
In the same way the Apiarian can easily strengthen all his colonies which are feeble in Spring.
"In the same way, a merchant shall be spared his merchandise, and a husbandman the implements of his husbandry, if they fall upon the mercy of a royal court."
"In the second place, they are completed offenses;[128] the President cannot pardon by anticipation, otherwise he would be invested with the power to dispense with the laws, his claim to which was the principal cause of James II's forced abdication."
"In this connection it has been held that even though an Indian has become a citizen, yet so long as he remains a member of his tribe, under the charge of an Indian agent, and so long as the United States holds in trust the title to land which has been allotted him, Congress can forbid the sale of intoxicants to him."
"In this latter decision, the accused, an 18-year-old Italian immigrant, unable to understand the English language, was convicted of murder and sentenced to life imprisonment on a plea of guilty when, notwithstanding a recital in the record that he was arraigned in open court and advised through interpreters, one of whom was the arresting officer, of the meaning and effect of a guilty plea, and that he signed a statement waiving a jury trial and pleading guilty, the waiver was not in fact signed by him and no plea of guilty actually had been entered."
"In Wakeman v. Robinson,another runaway case, there was evidence that the defendant pulled the wrong rein, and that he ought to have kept a straight course."
"Indeed, were it otherwise, the action of the Court in disallowing President Truman's seizure order would have been of very questionable validity, inasmuch as the President himself conceded that Congress could do so."
"Individuality If the foregoing qualities enter into a scout's training, an individuality will be developed in him, which will make itself known and felt."
"Invoking the supremacy clause, the Supreme Court held that a person could not be guilty of a crime under State law for doing what it was his duty to do as an officer of the United States."
It could not be committed by one who was in possession himself.
"It has already been observed that an easement of fencing may be annexed to land, and it was then asked what was the difference in kind between a right to have another person build such structures, and a right to have him repair structures already built."
"It has been said, for instance, in this connection, that a carrier is a servant; while nothing can be clearer than that, while goods are in custody, they are in his possession."
"It has been scientifically proved that if you deliberately _make_ your voice and face cheerful and bright you immediately begin to feel that way; and as cheerfulness is one of the most certain signs of good health, a Scout who appears cheerful is far more likely to keep well than one who lets herself get down in the mouth."
"It has been the aim to give as wide a selection as possible, in order that the boy scout might not fail to find in the local public library, some book on any subject in which he may have particular interest."
"It has often been said that malice is one of the elements of liability, and the doctrine is commonly stated in this way: that malice must exist, but that it is presumed by law from the mere speaking of the words; that again you may rebut this presumption of malice by showing that the words were spoken under circumstances which made the communication privileged,--as, for instance, by a lawyer in the necessary course of his argument, or by a person answering in good faith to inquiries as to the character of a former servant,-- and then, it is said, the plaintiff may meet this defence in some cases by showing that the words were spoken with actual malice."
It is a promise each girl _voluntarily_ makes; it is not a rule of her home nor a command from her school nor a custom of her church.
"It is certain that the Creator, has for some wise reason, set a limit to the increase of numbers in a single colony; and I shall venture to assign what appears to me to have been one reason for His so doing."
"It is just as much murder to shoot a sentry for the purpose of releasing a friend, as to shoot him because you hate him."
It is just Harry's prudence and she is used to that.
"It is quite enough, therefore, for the law, that man, by an instinct which he shares with the domestic dog, and of which the seal gives a most striking example, will not allow himself to be dispossessed, either by force or fraud, of what he holds, without trying to get it back again."
"It is really very difficult for one who has carefully watched the habits of bees, to speak of his little favorites in any other way than as though they possessed an intelligence almost, if not quite, akin to reason."
It is recommended that each scout make his own flags.
"It is true that the Marshal's case speaks of his negligent [201] keeping when the prisoners were released by rebels, (although that was far less likely to result from negligence, one would think, than a fire in the prison,) and that after Lord Coke's time negligence was alleged, although the goods had been lost by wrongful taking."
"It is used by occultists in the sense of: having harmonious vibrations with another, the occult teachings being that every person has his or her own rate of mental vibration which, when in harmonious accord with the vibrations of another, induces the most favorable conditions for the production of mental or psychic phenomena, or mental relations; sympathetic understanding, etc."
It is well to have a catcher behind each player to save him if he falls.
"It may then be rejected by the person to whom it is tendered; and if it be rejected, we have discovered no power in a court to force it on him."
"It might be assumed that trespass is founded on the defendant's having caused damage by his act, without regard to negligence."
"It should be added, however, that it is laid down in the same book that, if the vessel is detained in port by the local authorities, the master is not bound to give the mariners wages, for he has earned no freight."
"It should be noted that Justice Holmes couples with his invocation of the clear and present danger test in his dissent in this case the contention that rightly construed the act of Congress involved (The Espionage Act of May 16, 1918; 40 Stat."
"It should enable an Apiarian who lives in the neighborhood of human pilferers, to lock up the precious contents of his hives, in some cheap, simple and convenient way."
"It should enable the Apiarian to multiply his colonies with a certainty and rapidity which are entirely out of the question, if he depends upon natural swarming."
It was alleged that the defendant performed his cure so negligently that the horse died.
"It was headed by Mr Elihu Root, with the rank of ambassador, while some of his associates bore the rank of envoy extraordinary."
"It was this characteristic of Livingstone, the great explorer, that made him what he was, and that has marked the career of all good scouts."
It was to be expected that some action should be given to the bailor as soon as the law had got machinery which could be worked without help from the fresh pursuit and armed hands of the possessor and his friends.
"It will also be noticed in the cases before that time, that there is no settled formula for the obligation in question, but that it is set forth in each case that the defendant was answerable for what he was said to have done or omitted in the particular instance."
"Just as soon as the Apiarian begins to multiply his stocks with very great rapidity, he must calculate upon feeding great quantities of honey to his bees."
Justice Clark expressly limited his concurrence to the judgment of the Court.
"Justice Field pointed the way for this development in his dissenting opinion in O'Neil _v._ Vermont,[12] wherein the majority refused to apply the Eighth Amendment to a State."
Justice Holmes presented a dissenting opinion for himself and Justice Brandeis which contains a curious note of fatalism.
Justice Holmes was joined in his dissent by Justices Brandeis and Stone.
"Justice Jackson also protested: We cannot, he said, give some constitutional rights a preferred position without relegating others to a deferred position."
"Justice Jackson, joined by Justices Frankfurter and Roberts, dissented on the ground that the accused not only denied that the protracted questioning had the effect of forcing an involuntary confession from him but that he had ever confessed at all, a contention which reputable witnesses contradicted."
Justice Murphy announced that he favored affirming the conviction and therefore dissented.
"Kephart, in his book on Camping and Woodcraft (p. 28), says: When there is nothing dry to strike it on, jerk the head {160} of the match forward through the teeth."
Know how the principal officers in his town or city are elected and for what terms.
"Knowledge that the act which causes death will probably cause the death of, or grievous bodily harm to, some person, whether such person is the person actually killed or not, although such knowledge is accompanied by indifference whether death or grievous bodily harm is caused or not, or by a wish that it may not be caused; (c.) An intent to commit any felony whatever; (d.) An intent to oppose by force any officer of justice on his way to, in, or returning from the execution of the duty of arresting, keeping in custody, or imprisoning any person whom he is lawfully entitled to arrest, keep in custody, or imprison, or the duty of keeping the peace or dispersing an unlawful assembly, provided that the offender has notice that the person killed is such an officer so employed."
Labor Saving The housekeeper must learn how to do her work in the least possible time; she must save steps.
"Let it make no difference, banker, merchant, kinsman or friend, do not fear to give offence, but right then and there, count the money he gave you."
"Letter of Attorney General McReynolds to the Secretary to the President, dated August 28, 1914, stating that it would be incompatible with the public interest to send to the Senate in response to its resolution, reports made to the Attorney General by his associates regarding violations of law by the Standard Oil Co. Letter of Attorney General Gregory to the President of the Senate, dated February 23, 1915, declining to comply with a resolution of the Senate requesting the Attorney General to report to the Senate his findings and conclusions in the investigation of the smelting industry."
Likewise in United States _v._ Ferreira[129] the Court sustained the act conferring powers on the Florida territorial court to examine claims arising under the Spanish treaty and to report his decisions and the evidence on which they were based to the Secretary of the Treasury for subsequent action.
"Likewise, a Tennessee statute which made the amount of the annual license tax exacted for the privilege of doing railway construction work dependent upon whether the person taxed had his chief office within or without the State, was found to be incompatible with the comity clause."
"Lincoln's early life was cradled in the woods, and all of life out of doors had been his in the new and pioneer states of the {338} wilderness."
Lincoln's emancipation of the slaves was made only after he had convinced himself it could not be longer deferred and preserve the Union.
"Looking into the eager faces of longing and questioning, his Spirit moved within him and he spoke: I went, I sought, I found the Great Spirit who dwells in the earth as your spirits dwell in your bodies."
"Lord Holt's famous opinion in the latter case quotes largely from the Roman law as it filtered to him through Bracton; but, whatever influence that may have had upon his general views, the point decided and the distinctions touching common carriers were of English growth."
"Make the required athletic standard according to his weight, classifications and conditions as stated in chapter eight."
"Mann, however, strongly resented the charge that he was opposed to religious instruction in the public schools."
"Many would like to keep bees, if they could have them taken care of, by those who would undertake their management, just as a gardener does the gardens and grounds of his employers."
Marching Against the Iroquois Everett T. Tomlinson Marion and His Men John De Morgan David McKay Master of the Strong Hearts E. S. Brooks Off the Rocks Grenfell S. S. Tirnes On the Indian Trail Egerton R. Young Revell Co. On the Old Kearsarge Cyrus Townsend Brady Scribners On General Thomas's Staff Byron A. Dunn McClurg Paul Revere John De Morgan David McKay Peggy Owen Lucy Foster Madison Penn Pub.
Marshall's answer to this can only be inferred from his statement at the end of his opinion.
"Milton is believed by many, to have been a better poet, for his blindness; and it is highly probable that Huber was a better Apiarian, for the same cause."
"Monroe himself ultimately adopted the broadest view of the spending power, from which, however, he carefully excluded any element of regulatory or police power."
"More recently, the Court, sustained, by only a five-to-four vote, however, a conviction for murder where the trial court rejected the defendant's request that he be present at a view of the scene of the murder to which the jury had been taken."
"More than this, the same reasoning would make a defendant responsible for all damage, however remote, of which his act could be called the cause."
"Moreover, for a long time after Henry II., whenever an action was brought for a debt of which there was no written evidence, the plaintiff, when asked what he had to show for it, always answered good suit, and tendered his witnesses, who were sometimes examined by the court."
Morgan from the chairmanship of TVA for refusal to produce evidence in substantiation of charges which he had levelled at his fellow directors.
"Most Apiarians before his time, supposed that it was made from pollen or bee-bread, either in a crude or digested state."
Mr Creery regarding a number of experiments he had conducted with his four children.
"Mr Samuel Wagner of York, Pa., has recently communicated to me a very original and exceedingly ingenious theory of his own, which he thinks will account for all the facts without admitting that the Queen Bee has any special knowledge or will on the subject."
"Mr Taylor writes the word accepted, with the date and his name across the face of the draft, and if he does not pay cash, he states in the writing where payment will be made."
"Murder is defined by Sir James Stephen, in his Digest of Criminal Law, as unlawful homicide with malice aforethought."
"My wish for every Girl Scout who undertakes a garden is that she may have all these satisfactions, and may follow all these delightful paths that lead to knowledge, and through knowledge to joy."
"Nay, why need the defendant have acted at all, and why is it not enough that his existence has been at the expense of the plaintiff?"
Neither can force nor influence a person to go to or to remain away from church against his will or force him to profess a belief or disbelief in any religion.
"Neither our ignorance of all the facts necessary to their full elucidation, nor our inability to harmonize these facts in their mutual relations and dependencies, will justify us in rejecting any truth which God has seen fit to reveal, either in the book of nature, or in His holy word."
"Neither would be liable to an action, and, according to what has been said, each has done all that he promised to do in the event which has happened, to wit, nothing."
"Nevertheless, if the tenant recognized him, the disseisor would be protected as against persons who could not show a better title."
"No act of Congress, no act even of the President himself, can, by constitutional possibility, authorize or create any military officer not subordinate to the President."
"No constable or other bailiff of ours shall take corn or other provisions from any one without immediately tendering money therefor, unless he can have postponement thereof by permission of the seller."
"No constable or other bailiff of ours shall take corn or other provisions from anyone without immediately tendering money therefor, unless he can have postponement thereof by permission of the seller."
Nor did it require him to make any findings of fact to disclose the basis of his action.
Nor does it apply to statements made by an accused on his own premises to an undercover agent whose identity was not suspected and who had on his person a radio transmitter which communicated the statements to another agent outside the building.
"Nor has any procedure been established for determining the question of inability, with the result that in the two instances of disability which have occurred, those of Presidents Garfield and Wilson, the former continued in office until his death and the other, after his partial recovery, till the end of his term."
"Nor was any attention given the fact that Lincoln had asked Congress to ratify and confirm his acts, which Congress promptly did,[54] with the exception of his suspension of the _habeas corpus_ privilege which was regarded by many as attributable to the President in the situation then existing, by virtue of his duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed."
